Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2333.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 31-3 of the General Laws entitled "Registration of Vehicles" is
hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
31-3-132. Special plate for the Rhode Island Hockey Hall of Fame.
(a) The administrator of the division of motor vehicles is empowered to make available
special motor vehicle registration plates for the not-for-profit entity Rhode Island Hockey Hall of
Fame. The plates shall be designed to reference the not-for-profit entity Rhode Island Hockey Hall
of Fame.
(b) The special plate shall be displayed upon the same registration number assigned to the
vehicle for which it was issued and shall be used in place of and in the same manner as the
registration plates issued to the vehicle. The original registration plates for the vehicle shall be
removed from the vehicle and returned to the division of motor vehicles. The registration certificate
for the plates shall be carried in the vehicle in accordance with § 31-3-9. The registration certificate
shall be in effect for the special plate.
(c) The Rhode Island Hockey Hall of Fame motor vehicle plates shall be the same size as
regular motor vehicle plates and shall be designed by the Rhode Island Hockey Hall of Fame in
conjunction with the division of motor vehicles, with the design approved by the Rhode Island state
police.
(d) The Rhode Island Hockey Hall of Fame plates shall be subject to compliance with §
31-3-117 relating to the number of minimum prepaid orders of plates per plate type (i.e., passenger,

commercial, etc.) and any required payment. The Rhode Island Hockey Hall of Fame plates shall
not be issued unless the minimum order requirements are met. The initial order will be handled by
the Rhode Island Hockey Hall of Fame and shall not be submitted to the division of motor vehicles
for production until the minimum order(s) have been met and the proper paper work submitted to
the division.
(e) The administrator of motor vehicles shall develop prepayment procedures and any other
procedures deemed necessary to carry out the purposes of this section.
(f) In addition to the regular prescribed motor vehicle registration fee, Rhode Island
Hockey Hall of Fame plates shall be subject to a forty dollar ($40.00) issuance surcharge.
(g) The forty dollar ($40.00) issuance surcharge shall be allocated as follows: twenty
dollars ($20.00) shall be allocated to the general fund and the remaining twenty dollars ($20.00)
shall be distributed annually to the Rhode Island Hockey Hall of Fame to commemorate, preserve,
and promote the game of hockey in Rhode Island.
(h) A ten dollar ($10.00) surcharge for subsequent registration renewals shall be allocated
to the Rhode Island Hockey Hall of Fame.
(i) In consideration of the receipt of funds from the registration of Rhode Island Hockey
Hall of Fame plates, the Rhode Island Hockey Hall of Fame must use any Rhode Island-sourced
funds in and for the benefit of Rhode Island-based charitable organizations.
(j) The Rhode Island Hockey Hall of Fame will be required to submit an annual accounting
report before such monies are distributed.
(k) There shall be no refunds for early cancellation of Rhode Island Hockey Hall of Fame
plates.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC003607
========
LC003607 - Page 2 of 3